Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-885
Sale or conveyance of unit; release of liens.

(a) In the case of a sale of a unit where delivery of a public-offering statement is required pursuant to subsection (c) of section 76-879, a seller shall, before conveying a unit, record or furnish to the purchaser, releases of all liens affecting that unit and its common element interest which the purchaser does not expressly agree to take subject to or assume. This subsection does not apply to any real estate which a declarant has the right to withdraw.

(b) Before conveying real estate to the association the declarant shall have that real estate released from: (1) all liens the foreclosure of which would deprive unit owners of any right of access to or easement of support of their units, and (2) all other liens on that real estate unless the public-offering statement describes certain real estate which may be conveyed subject to liens in specified amounts.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 61.